District of Columbia statutes.
20-522

Termination; general.

The appointment of a personal representative shall be terminated in accordance with Chapter 13 of this title (Closing the Estate) or by the personal representative’s death, disability, resignation, or removal as provided in sections 20-524 through 20-527 .

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-522.